Massachusetts, session 194th, H4983.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. This act shall be cited as “A Beautiful Brunch Act”.
SECTION 2. Section 33 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 13, the figure “10:00” and inserting in
place thereof the following figure:- 8:00.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1